Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 16 DEALERS AND SALESMEN LICENSING
§ 49-1611. Display, form and custody of dealer’s and salesman’s license.

The department shall prescribe each form of the vehicle dealer’s and salesman’s license. It shall be the duty of each dealer to display conspicuously his own license in his place of business. The department shall prepare and deliver a pocket identification card, which shall certify that the person whose name appears on the card is a licensed vehicle dealer or vehicle salesman, as the case may be, and each vehicle dealer’s or vehicle salesman’s card shall contain a current photograph of the applicant and the date of expiration of the license. Each and every vehicle dealer and vehicle salesman shall, upon request, display his card.

§ 49-1612. Notice of change of address.

The department shall not issue a dealer’s license to any applicant who does not have a principal place of business. Should the dealer change the site or location of his principal place of business, he shall immediately upon making the change notify the department, and a new license shall be granted for the unexpired portion of the term of the license, providing the new location meets all the requirements for a principal place of business. Should a dealer cease to be in possession of a principal place of business from and on which he conducts the business for which he is licensed, he shall immediately notify the department and upon demand by the department shall deliver the dealer’s license, which shall be held and retained until it shall be made to appear to the department that the licensee has again come into possession of a principal place of business, whereupon the dealer’s license shall be reissued to him, without charge. Nothing in the provisions of this chapter shall be construed to prevent a dealer from conducting the business for which the dealer is licensed at one (1) or more licensed supplemental lots or locations not contiguous to the dealer’s principal place of business but operated and maintained in conjunction with it.

The department shall not issue a vehicle manufacturer’s license to any applicant who does not have an established place of business within Idaho. Should the vehicle manufacturer change his established place of business within Idaho, the licensee shall immediately upon making the change, notify the department of the location and address of the new established place of business, and a new license shall be granted for the unexpired portion of the term of the license.

§ 49-1613. Unlawful acts by licensee.

It shall be unlawful for the holder of any license issued under the provisions of this chapter to:

Intentionally publish or circulate any advertising which is misleading or inaccurate in any material particular or which misrepresents any of the products sold or furnished by a licensed dealer;

Violate any of the provisions of this chapter or any of the applicable rules;

Knowingly purchase, sell or otherwise acquire or dispose of a stolen vehicle;

Violate any law respecting commerce in vehicles or any lawful rule respecting commerce in vehicles promulgated by any licensing or regulating authority now existing or hereafter created by the laws of the state;

Engage in the business for which the dealer is licensed without at all times maintaining a principal place of business;

Engage in a type of business respecting the selling or exchanging of vehicles for which he is not licensed;

Knowingly purchase a vehicle which has an altered or removed vehicle identification number plate or alter or remove a vehicle identification number plate;

Violate any provision of this title or any rules promulgated;

Violate any provision of the federal motor vehicle safety standards, federal odometer laws or regulations; or

Display for sale, exchange, or sell any vehicle for which the vehicle dealer does not hold title or consignment agreement or other documentary evidence of his right to the possession of every vehicle in his possession.

It shall be unlawful for any manufacturer or distributor licensed under this chapter to require, attempt to require, coerce, or attempt to coerce, any new vehicle dealer in this state to:

Order or accept delivery of any new vehicle, part or accessory, equipment or any other commodity not required by law which shall not have been voluntarily ordered by the new vehicle dealer. This paragraph is not intended to modify or supersede any terms or provisions of a franchise requiring dealers to market a representative line of vehicles which the manufacturer or distributor is publicly advertising.

Order or accept delivery of any new vehicle with special features, accessories or equipment not included in the list price of such vehicles as publicly advertised by the manufacturer or distributor.

Participate monetarily in an advertising campaign or contest, or to purchase any promotional materials, training materials, showroom or other display decorations or materials at the expense of the dealer.

Enter into any agreement with the manufacturer or distributor or to do any other act prejudicial to the dealer by threatening to terminate or cancel a franchise or any contractual agreement existing between the dealer and the manufacturer or distributor. This paragraph is not intended to preclude the manufacturer or distributor from insisting on compliance with reasonable terms or provisions of the franchise or other contractual agreement, and notice in good faith to any dealer of the dealer’s violation of those terms or provisions shall not constitute a violation of the provisions of this chapter.

Change the capital structure of the dealer or the means by or through which the dealer finances the operation of the dealership, provided that the dealer at all times meets any reasonable capital standards determined by the manufacturer or distributor in accordance with uniformly applied criteria. No change in the capital structure shall cause a change in the principal management or have the effect of a sale of the franchise without the consent of the manufacturer or distributor. Consent shall not be unreasonably withheld.

Refrain from participation in the management of, investment in, or the acquisition of any other line of new vehicle or related products. This paragraph does not apply unless the dealer maintains a reasonable line of credit for each make or line of new vehicle, and the dealer remains in compliance with any reasonable facilities requirements of the manufacturer or distributor, and no change is made in the principal management of the dealership.

Prospectively assent to a release, assignment, novation, waiver or estoppel which would relieve any person from liability to be imposed by this chapter or to require any controversy between a dealer and a manufacturer, distributor, or representatives, to be referred to any person other than the duly constituted courts of the state or the United States, or to the director, if that referral would be binding upon the dealer.

Either establish or maintain exclusive facilities, personnel, or display space.

Expand facilities without a written guarantee of a sufficient supply of new vehicles so as to justify an expansion, in light of the market and economic conditions.

Make significant modifications to an existing dealership or to construct a new vehicle dealership facility without providing a written guarantee of a sufficient supply of new vehicles so as to justify modification or construction, in light of the market and economic conditions.

It shall be unlawful for any manufacturer or distributor licensed under this chapter to:

Delay, refuse, or fail to deliver new vehicles or new vehicle parts or accessories in a reasonable time, and in reasonable quantity, relative to the dealer’s facilities and sales potential in the dealer’s relevant market area, after acceptance of an order from a dealer having a franchise for the retail sale of any new vehicle sold or distributed by the manufacturer or distributor, any new vehicle, parts or accessories to new vehicles as are covered by the franchise, if the vehicle, parts, or accessories are publicly advertised as being available for delivery or actually being delivered. These provisions are not violated, however, if failure is caused by acts or causes beyond the control of the manufacturer or distributor.

Refuse to disclose to any dealer handling the same line, the manner and mode of distribution of that line within the relevant market area.

Obtain money, goods, service, or any other benefit from any other person with whom the dealer does business, on account of, or in relation to, the transaction between the dealer and other person, other than for compensation for services rendered, unless the benefit is promptly accounted for, and transmitted to the dealer.

Increase prices of new vehicles which the dealer had ordered for consumers prior to the dealer’s receipt of the written official price increase notification. A sales contract signed by a consumer shall constitute evidence of each such order, provided that the vehicle is in fact delivered to that customer. In the event of manufacturer or distributor price reductions or cash rebates paid to the dealer, the amount of any reduction or rebate received by a dealer shall be passed on to the private retail consumer by the dealer. Price reductions shall apply to all vehicles in the dealer’s inventory which were subject to the price reduction. Price differences applicable to new model or series shall not be considered a price increase or price decrease. Price changes caused by the addition to a vehicle of required or optional equipment, or revaluation of the United States dollar, in the case of foreign-make vehicles or components, or an increase in transportation charges due to increased rates imposed by a carrier, shall not be subject to the provisions of this subsection.

Release to any outside party, except under subpoena or as otherwise required by law or in an administrative, judicial or arbitration proceeding involving the manufacturer or distributor or dealer, any business, financial, or personal information which may be provided from time to time by the dealer to the manufacturer or distributor without the express written consent of the dealer.

Deny any dealer the right of free association with any other dealer for any lawful purpose.

Unfairly compete with a dealer in the same line make, operating under an agreement or franchise from the aforementioned manufacturer or distributor, in the relevant market area. A manufacturer or distributor shall not, however, be deemed to be competing when operating a dealership either temporarily for a reasonable period, in any case not to exceed one (1) year, or in a retail operation which is for sale to any qualified independent person at a fair and reasonable price, or in a relationship in which an independent person has made a significant investment subject to loss in the dealership and can reasonably expect to acquire full ownership of that dealership on reasonable terms and conditions. Upon a showing of good cause by the manufacturer or distributor to the department, the period of temporary ownership may be extended up to one (1) additional year, resulting in a maximum temporary ownership period of two (2) years.

Unfairly discriminate among its dealers with respect to warranty reimbursement.

Unreasonably withhold consent to the sale, transfer, or exchange of the franchise to a qualified buyer capable of being licensed as a dealer in this state or to condition the sale, transfer, or exchange of a franchise agreement upon site control or an agreement to renovate or make improvements to a facility, unless required by the technology of a motor vehicle being sold at the facility. Provided however, that a voluntary acceptance of such conditions by the dealer in writing including, but not limited to, a written agreement for which the dealer has accepted separate and valuable consideration, shall not constitute a violation.

Fail to respond in writing to a request for consent as specified in paragraph (i) of this section [subsection] within sixty (60) days of receipt of a written request on the forms, if any, generally utilized by the manufacturer or distributor for those purposes and containing the required information. Failure to respond shall be deemed to be consent to the request.

Prevent or attempt to prevent, by contract or otherwise, any dealer from changing the executive management control of the dealership unless the manufacturer or distributor, having the burden of proof, can show that the change of executive management will result in executive management or control by a person or persons who are not of good moral character or who do not meet reasonable, preexisting and, with consideration given to the volume of sales and service of the dealership, uniformly applied minimum business experience standards. Where the manufacturer or distributor rejects a proposed change in executive management control, the manufacturer or distributor shall give written notice of his reasons to the dealer within sixty (60) days of notice to the manufacturer or distributor by the dealer of the proposed change; otherwise, the change in the executive management of the dealership shall be presumptively considered approved.

Terminate, cancel or fail to renew any franchise solely because of the death or incapacity of an owner who is not listed in the franchise as one on whose expertise and abilities the manufacturer or distributor relied in the granting of the franchise.

Prevent or attempt to prevent the dealer, by written instrument or otherwise, from either receiving the fair market value of the dealership in a sale transaction, or from transferring the dealership to a spouse or legal heir, as specified in this chapter.

Engage in any predatory practice or discrimination against any dealer.

Resort to or to use any false or misleading advertisement in the conducting of his business as a manufacturer or distributor in this state.

Make any false or misleading statement, either directly or through any agent or employee, in order to induce any dealer to enter into any agreement or franchise, or to take any action which is prejudicial to that dealer or his business.

Require or coerce dealers to participate in local or national advertising campaigns or contests or to require or coerce dealers to purchase promotional or display materials.

Charge back, deny motor vehicle allocation, withhold payments, or take other actions against a dealer, or to condition a franchise agreement, or renewal of a franchise agreement, or to condition sales, service, parts, or finance incentives upon site control or an agreement to renovate or make improvements to a facility unless required by the technology of a motor vehicle being sold at the facility. Provided however, that a voluntary acceptance of such conditions by the dealer in writing including, but not limited to, a written agreement for which the dealer has accepted separate and valuable consideration, shall not constitute a violation.

Charge back, deny motor vehicle allocation, withhold payments, or take other actions against a motor vehicle dealer if a motor vehicle sold by the motor vehicle dealer is exported from Idaho or the dealer’s assigned area of responsibility unless the manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative proves that the motor vehicle dealer knew or reasonably should have known a motor vehicle was intended to be exported, which shall operate as a rebuttable presumption that the motor vehicle dealer did not have such knowledge. This paragraph does not apply if exporting of motor vehicles outside of the state of Idaho is provided for by the manufacturer or distributor.

It is unlawful for any manufacturer or distributor or any officer, agent or representative to coerce, or attempt to coerce, any dealer in this state to offer to sell or sell any extended service contract or extended maintenance plan that is offered, sold, backed by or sponsored by the manufacturer or distributor or to sell, assign or transfer any retail installment sales contract, obtained by the dealer in connection with the sale by him in this state of new vehicles, manufactured or sold by the manufacturer or distributor, to a specified finance company or class of such companies, or to any other specified person, by any of the acts or means set forth, namely by:

Any statement, suggestion, promise or threat that the manufacturer or distributor will, in any manner, benefit or injure the dealer, whether the statement, suggestion, threat or promise is express or implied or made directly or indirectly;

Any act that will benefit or injure the dealer;

Any contract, or any express or implied offer of contract, made directly or indirectly to a dealer for handling new vehicles, on the condition that the dealer shall offer to sell or sell any extended service contract or extended maintenance plan that is offered, sold, backed by, or sponsored by the manufacturer or distributor or sell, assign or transfer his retail installment sales contract in this state to a specified finance company or class of such companies, or to any other specified person; or

Any express or implied statement or representation made directly or indirectly that the dealer is under any obligation whatsoever to offer to sell or sell any extended service contract or extended maintenance plan that is offered, sold, backed by, or sponsored by the manufacturer or distributor or to sell, assign or transfer any of his retail sales contracts, in this state, on new vehicles manufactured or sold by that manufacturer or distributor to a finance company or class of companies, or other specified person, because of any relationship or affiliation between the manufacturer or distributor and a finance company or companies, or a specified person or persons.
(e) Nothing contained in this subsection shall prohibit a manufacturer or distributor from offering or providing incentive benefits or bonus programs to a retail motor vehicle dealer or prospective retail motor vehicle dealer in this state who makes the voluntary decision to offer to sell or sell any extended service contract or extended maintenance plan offered, sold, backed or sponsored by the manufacturer or distributor to sell, assign or transfer any retail installment sale or lease by him in this state of motor vehicles manufactured or sold by the manufacturer or distributor to a specified finance company or leasing company controlled by or affiliated with the manufacturer or distributor.

It is unlawful for any manufacturer or distributor or agent or employee of a manufacturer or distributor to use a written instrument, agreement, or waiver to attempt to nullify any of the provisions of this section, and such agreement, written instrument or waiver shall be null and void.

It shall be unlawful, directly or indirectly, to impose unreasonable restrictions on the dealer relative to the sale, transfer, right to renew, termination discipline, noncompetition covenants, site control (whether by sublease, collateral pledge of lease, or otherwise), right of first refusal to purchase, option to purchase, compliance with subjective standards and assertion of legal or equitable rights.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all written franchise agreements between a manufacturer or distributor and a dealer, including the franchise offering, the franchise agreement, sales of goods, services or advertising, leases or mortgages of real or personal property, promises to pay, security interests, pledges, insurance contract, advertising contract, construction or installation contract, servicing contracts and all other agreements where the manufacturer or distributor has any direct or indirect interest.

Any statement, threats, promises, acts, contracts or offers of contracts, when the effect may be to lessen or eliminate competition or tend to create a monopoly, are declared unfair trade practices and unfair methods of competition, against the policy of this state, and are unlawful.

§ 49-1614. Termination, cancellation or nonrenewal.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions or conditions of any franchise agreement, or any waiver, a manufacturer shall not cancel, terminate or fail to renew any franchise agreement with a dealer unless the manufacturer has satisfied the notice requirement of subsection (2) of this section and has good cause for cancellation, termination or nonrenewal.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions or conditions of any franchise agreement prior to the termination, cancellation or nonrenewal of any franchise agreement, the manufacturer shall furnish notification of termination, cancellation or nonrenewal to the department and the dealer:

In the manner described in subsection (3)(b) [subsection (3)] of this section; and

Not less than ninety (90) days prior to the effective date of termination, cancellation or nonrenewal; or

Not less than fifteen (15) days prior to the effective date of termination, cancellation or nonrenewal with respect to any of the following:

Insolvency of the dealership, or filing of any petition by or against the dealership under any bankruptcy or receivership law;

Failure of the dealership to conduct its customary sales and service operations during its customary business hours for seven (7) consecutive business days, except for acts of God or circumstances beyond the direct control of the dealer;

Conviction of the dealer, or any owner or his operator, resulting in imprisonment exceeding thirty (30) days;

Revocation of any license which the dealer is required to have to operate a dealership; and

Not less than one hundred eighty (180) days prior to the effective date of termination or cancellation, where the manufacturer is discontinuing the sale of the product line.

Notification under this section shall be in writing, by certified mail or personally delivered to the dealer, and shall contain a statement of intention to terminate, cancel or not to renew the franchise agreement, and a statement of the reasons for and the date on which termination, cancellation or nonrenewal takes effect.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions or conditions of any franchise agreement or of any waiver, good cause shall exist for the purposes of a termination, cancellation or nonrenewal when there is a failure by the dealer to comply with a provision of the franchise agreement, where the provision is both reasonable and of material significance to the franchise agreement relationship, and provided that the dealer has been notified in writing of the failure within one hundred eighty (180) days prior to termination, cancellation or nonrenewal. A protest may be filed in accordance with the provisions of section 49-1617, Idaho Code.

Notwithstanding any franchise agreement, the following shall not constitute good cause for a termination, cancellation or nonrenewal of a franchise agreement: the fact that the dealer owns, has an investment in, participates in the management of or holds a franchise agreement for the sale or service of another make or line of motor vehicles; or that the dealer has established another make or line of new motor vehicles or service in the same dealership facilities as those of the manufacturer or distributor which existed prior to January 1, 1997; or is approved in writing by the manufacturer.

The manufacturer shall have the burden of proof under this section concerning the issue of good cause, which shall include, but not be limited to, termination, nonrenewal or cancellation of any franchise agreement by the manufacturer for insolvency, license revocation, conviction of a felony, fraud by a dealer or failure by a dealer to comply with a provision of the franchise agreement, where the provision is both reasonable and of material significance to the franchise agreement relationship.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions or conditions of any franchise agreement, other written contract or agreement or any waiver, a manufacturer shall not cancel, terminate or fail to renew any franchise agreement with a dealer unless the manufacturer has satisfied the requirements of this section.

Upon the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of any franchise agreement by the manufacturer or dealer, the manufacturer shall repurchase from the dealer any new, undamaged and unused motor vehicles of the current model year and previous model year. Any new and unused motor vehicle repurchased by the manufacturer shall be repurchased at the net cost to the dealer. Net cost means the dealer’s cost for a new, undamaged, unsold, and complete motor vehicle of the current model year or any previous model year acquired by the dealer within twelve (12) months of the date of termination and in a dealer’s inventory purchased from the manufacturer or acquired from another dealer of the same line make in the ordinary course of business:

Plus any charges by the manufacturer, distributor, or representative for distribution, delivery and taxes;

Plus the dealer’s cost of any manufacturer approved accessories added on the vehicle, except only those recreational vehicle accessories that are listed in the manufacturer’s wholesale product literature as options for that vehicle shall be repurchased; and

Less all allowances paid to the dealer by the manufacturer, distributor or representative.

Upon the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of any franchise agreement by the manufacturer or dealer, the manufacturer shall repurchase from the dealer the following:
(9)(a) Upon the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of any franchise agreement by the manufacturer or dealer, the manufacturer shall repurchase from the dealer the following:

Any unused, undamaged, and unsold parts which have been acquired from the manufacturer, provided such parts are currently offered for sale by the manufacturer in its current parts catalog and are in salable condition. Such parts shall be repurchased by the manufacturer at the current catalog price, less any applicable discount;

Any supplies, equipment, and furnishings, including manufacturer or line make signs, required by and purchased from the manufacturer or its approved source within three (3) years of the date of termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal; and

Any special tools or other equipment purchased from the manufacturer within three (3) years of the date of termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal.

Except as provided in paragraph (a)(i) of this subsection, compensation shall be the fair market value on the effective date of the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal.

The repurchase of any item under this section shall be accomplished within ninety (90) days of the effective date of the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal, provided the dealer has clear title to the inventory and other items, or is able to convey such title to the manufacturer and does convey or transfer title and possession of the inventory and other items to the manufacturer.

If the repurchase of any item under this section is subject to a security interest, the manufacturer may make payment jointly to the dealer and to the holder of the security interest.
(12) This section shall not apply to a nonrenewal or termination that is implemented as a result of the sale of the assets or stock of the motor vehicle dealer.

Interest on the amount due computed at the rate applicable to a judgment of a court; and

Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(13) In the event the manufacturer does not pay the dealer the amounts due under this section and a court of competent jurisdiction finds the manufacturer in violation of this section, the manufacturer shall, in addition to any amounts due, pay the dealer:

(14) Within ninety (90) days of the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of any franchise agreement by the manufacturer for the failure of a dealer to meet sales and service performance obligations or due to elimination, cessation or termination of a line make, the manufacturer shall commence to reimburse the dealer for one (1) year of the dealer’s cost to rent or lease the dealership’s facility or location or for the unexpired term of the lease or rental period, whichever is less, or, if the dealer owns the facility or location, for the equivalent of one (1) year of the reasonable rental value of the facilities or location as determined by an Idaho licensed commercial real estate appraiser. If more than one (1) franchise agreement is being terminated, canceled, or not renewed, the reimbursement shall be prorated equally among the different manufacturers. However, if a franchise agreement is terminated, canceled, or not renewed but the dealer continues in business at the same location under a different franchise agreement, the reimbursement required by this subsection shall not be required to be paid. In addition, any reimbursement due under this subsection shall be reduced by any amount received by the dealer by virtue of the dealer leasing, subleasing, or selling the facilities or location during the year immediately following the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal.

(15) All procedures and protections afforded to a motor vehicle dealer under this section shall be available to a recreational vehicle dealer. However, the remedies afforded under this section shall only apply to recreational vehicle dealers where the manufacturer of recreational vehicles as defined in section 49-119, Idaho Code, terminates or fails to renew any franchise agreement without good cause.

§ 49-1615. Succession to ownership.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions or conditions of any franchise:

A licensee may appoint by will, or any other written instrument, a designated family member to succeed in the ownership interest in the dealership.

Unless there exists good cause for refusal to honor succession on the part of the manufacturer, any designated family member of a deceased or incapacitated owner of a dealership may succeed to the ownership under the existing franchise, provided the designated family member gives the manufacturer written notice of his intention to succeed to the ownership of the dealership within one hundred twenty (120) days of the owner’s death or incapacity, and the designated family member agrees to be bound by all the terms and conditions of the franchise.

The manufacturer may request, and the designated family member shall provide, promptly upon request, personal and financial data that is reasonably necessary to determine whether the succession should be honored.

If a manufacturer believes that good cause exists for refusing to honor the succession to the ownership of a dealership by a family member of a deceased or incapacitated owner of a dealership under the existing franchise agreement, the manufacturer may, not more than sixty (60) days following receipt of notice of the designated family member’s intent to succeed to the ownership of the dealership, or any personal or financial data which it has requested, serve upon the designated family member and the department, notice of its refusal to honor the succession and of its intent to discontinue the existing franchise with the dealer no sooner than ninety (90) days from the date notice is served. The notice must state the specific grounds for a refusal to honor the succession. A protest may be filed in accordance with the provisions of section 49-1617, Idaho Code.

If notice of refusal and discontinuance is not timely served upon the family member, the franchise shall continue in effect subject to termination only as otherwise permitted under this chapter.

This chapter does not preclude the owner of a dealership from designating any person as his successor by written instrument filed with the manufacturer and, in the event there is a conflict between that written instrument and the provisions of this section, and that written instrument has not been revoked by the owner of the dealership, in writing, to the manufacturer, then the written instrument shall govern.

§ 49-1616. Limitations on establishing or relocating dealers.

In the event that a manufacturer seeks to enter into a franchise establishing an additional dealership or relocating an existing dealership within a radius of ten (10) miles from where the same line is represented, the manufacturer shall in writing, first notify the department and each dealer for the line within the ten (10) mile radius, at least sixty (60) days prior to the addition or relocation, of the intention to establish an additional dealership or to relocate an existing dealership within the ten (10) mile radius.

This section shall not apply to the relocation of an existing dealer within that dealer’s relevant market area, provided that the relocation not be at a site within a radius of seven (7) miles of a licensed franchise for the same line make of vehicle, or if the proposed franchise is to be established at or within a radius of two (2) miles of a location at which a former franchise for the same line make of new vehicle had ceased operating within the previous two (2) years. If the seven (7) and two (2) mile exceptions are not applicable, the relocation may still be possible upon notice and resolution of protest under subsections (1) and (3) of this section.

A protest may be filed in accordance with the provisions of section 49-1617, Idaho Code.

§ 49-1617. Protests — Hearings — Costs.

Within twenty (20) days of receiving notice or within twenty (20) days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by a manufacturer, a dealer, in respect to termination, cancellation or nonrenewal of a franchise, or establishing or relocating a dealership, or a designated family member for a refusal to honor the succession of the dealership, may file with the department to protest termination or refusal to honor the succession. When a protest is filed, the department shall inform the manufacturer that a timely protest has been filed and the manufacturer shall have twenty (20) days to respond to the protest. The manufacturer shall not terminate, establish a new or relocate a dealership, or discontinue the existing franchise until the department has held a hearing, nor subsequently, if the department has determined that there is not good cause for permitting the termination, addition, relocation or succession, or that the manufacturer is not acting in good faith.

The department shall select a hearing examiner to conduct a hearing and render proposed findings of fact. In determining whether good cause for termination exists the proposed findings of fact shall be conclusive unless clearly erroneous and unsupported by the record. In determining whether good cause for the refusal to honor the succession exists, the manufacturer has the burden of proving that the successor is a person who is not of good moral character or does not meet the manufacturer’s existing and reasonable standards and, considering the volume of sales and service of the dealership, uniformly applied minimum business experience standards in the consumer consumption channel. In determining whether good cause had been established for not entering into or relocating an additional franchise for the same line make, the department shall take into consideration the existing circumstances including:

Permanency of the investment of both the existing and proposed franchises;

Growth or decline in population and new car registrations in the consumer consumption area;

Effect on the consuming public in the relevant market area;

Whether it is injurious or beneficial to the public welfare for an additional franchise to be established;

Whether the franchises for the same line make in that relevant consumption area are providing adequate competition and convenient customer care for the vehicles of the line make in the market area, which shall include the adequacy of vehicle sales and service facilities, equipment, supply of vehicle parts, and qualified service personnel;

Whether the establishment of an additional franchise would increase competition and be in the public interest.

The department shall render its final determination within one hundred twenty (120) days after the manufacturer responds to the protest. Unless waived by the parties, failure to do so shall be deemed the equivalent of a determination that good cause does exist for termination, addition, relocation, or nonhonor of the succession, unless the delay is caused by acts of the manufacturer.
(4) All costs of the department, including the cost of the hearing examiner and the cost of preparing the record, shall be borne equally by the parties. The department may in its discretion award costs to the prevailing party in any hearing held pursuant to this chapter.